Massachusetts, session 194th, H3139.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 62C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding, after Section 64, the following new section:-
Section 64A. The secretary of state or the register of deeds in a county shall maintain a
record of all requests to access a property deed. The secretary of state or register of deeds shall
notify a property owner when a record request has been made on the property owner’s deed.
Such notification shall be made through mail to the property no later than 10 business days after
the deed has been requested.
of 1